Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB303.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Institution" means any college or university that is a part of the postsecondary education system as
defined in KRS 164.001 or a private accredited college or university;
(b) "Military healthcare personnel" means an individual who has received formal training and practical
experience in healthcare disciplines during his or her military service, including providing
emergency medical care, preventive healthcare, and specialized medical services; and
(c) "Professional licensure board" has the same meaning as in KRS 211.332.
(2) (a) Any institution may develop academic career pathways and integrated academic bridge programs for
military healthcare personnel that are designed to enable current and former military healthcare
personnel to achieve reduced time-to-credential outcomes. These pathways and integrated academic
bridge programs shall integrate military academic and experiential learning to accelerate the
transition from military to civilian healthcare credentialing based on developed military-to-civilian
occupational crosswalks for, at a minimum, the following occupations:
1. Infantryman;
2. Hospital Corpsman;
3. Biomedical Equipment Specialist;
4. Orthopedic Specialist;
5. Practical Nursing Specialist;
6. Operating Room Specialist;
7. Dental Specialist;
8. Physical Therapy Specialist;
9. Patient Administration Specialist;
10. Optical Laboratory Specialist;
11. Medical Logistics Specialist;
12. Medical Laboratory Specialist;
13. Occupational Therapist Specialist;
14. Nutrition Care Specialist;
15. Cardiovascular Specialist;
16. Radiology Specialist;
17. Pharmacy Specialist;
18. Veterinarian Food Inspection Specialist;
19. Preventive Medicine Specialist;
20. Animal Care Specialist;
21. Ear, Nose, and Throat (ENT) Specialist;
22. Respiratory Specialist;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
23. Combat Medic Specialist;
24. Behavioral Health Specialist;
25. Eye Specialist;
26. Independent Duty Medical Technician; and
27. Aerospace Medical Technician.
(b) Any military healthcare personnel academic career pathways and integrated academic bridge
programs shall be fully compatible with the Department of Defense SkillBridge Program.
(c) Any participating institution shall review military healthcare personnel related healthcare programs
in relationship to realistic earning potential and employability of the institution graduates and submit
a written report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee
on Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection no later than September 1 of each year. The
report shall include:
1. The minimum number of months or years required to complete the healthcare program and
the average number of months or years military healthcare personnel graduates of each
healthcare program were enrolled;
2. The graduation rate of each healthcare program and the military healthcare personnel
graduation rate;
3. The employment rate of military healthcare personnel graduates of each healthcare program
within twelve (12) months of graduation; and
4. A summary of all new actions taken by the institution during the reporting year to increase
military healthcare personnel participation and to reduce transitional barriers to healthcare
professionals.
(3) Any participating institution, in collaboration with the United States Department of Labor, Kentucky
veterans' organizations, the Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs, the Kentucky Department of
Military Affairs, and any other public or private entities, including state-based entities transitioning military
personnel to Kentucky-based employment, shall use healthcare and military recruiters, as well as other
dedicated resources, to advocate, facilitate, and promote the recruitment and enrollment of military
healthcare personnel into military healthcare academic and career pathways.
(4) Each professional licensure board shall collaborate with participating institutions to integrate the academic
career pathways and integrated academic bridge programs for military healthcare personnel into their
licensure requirements.
Signed by Governor March 19, 2025.